Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2704.14
Coin-operated laundering and cleaning machines; exemption.

Sales and use taxes shall not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of the use of coin-operated machines used for laundering and cleaning except the cleaning or washing of motor vehicles.

Laws 1992, LB 871, § 38;

Laws 2003, LB 282, § 56.